 UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 10-Q QUARTERLY REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 For the Quarterly Period Ended September 30, 2017 or TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 For the Transition Period from ____ to ____ Commission file number 1-7657 AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Registrant s telephone number, including area code (212) 640-2000 Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report. Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes No Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically and posted on its corporate website, if any, every Interactive Data File required to be submitted and posted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T ( 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit and post such files). Yes No Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions of large accelerated filer, accelerated filer, smaller reporting company, and emerging growth company in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act. If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes No Indicate the number of shares outstanding of each of the issuer s classes of common stock, as of the latest practicable date. Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY FORM 10-Q INDEX Table of Contents PART I. FINANCIAL INFORMATION °Item 1. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME (Unaudited) See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 1 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME (Unaudited) See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 2 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (Unaudited) See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 3 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS (Unaudited) See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 4 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS (Unaudited) See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 5 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 1. Basis of Presentation The Company American Express Company (the Company) is a global services company that provides customers with access to products, insights and experiences that enrich lives and build business success. The Company s principal products and services are charge and credit payment card products and travel-related services offered to consumers and businesses around the world. Business travel-related services are offered through the non-consolidated joint venture, American Express Global Business Travel (the GBT JV). The Company s various products and services are sold globally to diverse customer groups, including consumers, small businesses, mid-sized companies and large corporations. These products and services are sold through various channels, including direct mail, online applications, in-house and third-party sales forces and direct response advertising. The accompanying Consolidated Financial Statements should be read in conjunction with the Consolidated Financial Statements included in the Company s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016 (the Annual Report). If not materially different, certain footnote disclosures included therein have been omitted from this Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q. The interim consolidated financial information in this report has not been audited. In the opinion of management, all adjustments, which consist of normal recurring adjustments necessary for a fair statement of the interim period consolidated financial information, have been made. Results of operations reported for interim periods are not necessarily indicative of results for the entire year. The preparation of Consolidated Financial Statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America (GAAP) requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses, and the disclosures of contingent assets and liabilities. These accounting estimates reflect the best judgment of management, but actual results could differ. Certain reclassifications of prior period amounts have been made to conform to the current period presentation. Recently Issued Accounting Standards In May 2014, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) issued new accounting guidance on revenue recognition. The accounting standard establishes the principles to apply to determine the amount and timing of revenue recognition, specifying the accounting for certain costs related to revenue, and requiring additional disclosures about the nature, amount, timing and uncertainty of revenues and related cash flows. The guidance, as amended, supersedes most of the current revenue recognition requirements, and is effective January 1, 2018. Upon adoption of the new revenue recognition guidance, the Company will use the full retrospective method, which applies the new standard to each prior reporting period presented. The Company has made significant progress in determining the impact on its Consolidated Financial Statements and underlying operational processes. The most significant changes will be reclassifications from discount revenue to expenses related to Card Member cash-back reward costs and statement credits, as well as corporate incentive payments and net payments to third-party card issuing partners. These reclassifications will have a significant impact on the affected line items of the Consolidated Statements of Income, but will have no impact to net income. There will also be changes to the recognition timing of certain revenues; however, the impact of these changes to net income upon adoption will not be material. Similarly, upon adoption of the new standard, the impact on the Consolidated Balance Sheets and Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows will not be material. The Company is in the process of implementing changes to its accounting policies, business processes, systems and internal controls to support the recognition, measurement and disclosure requirements under the new standard. In January 2016, the FASB issued new accounting guidance on the recognition and measurement of financial assets and financial liabilities. The guidance, which is effective January 1, 2018, makes targeted changes to current GAAP, specifically to the classification and measurement of equity securities, and to certain disclosure requirements associated with the fair value of financial instruments. In the ordinary course of business, the Company makes investments in non-public companies currently recognized under the cost method of accounting. Under the new guidance, these investments will be prospectively adjusted for observable price changes upon the identification of identical or similar transactions of the same issuer. The Company expects that adopting this guidance will have an immaterial impact on its financial position, results of operations and cash flows, as well as on its accounting policies, business processes, systems and internal controls. 6 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) In February 2016, the FASB issued new accounting guidance on leases. The guidance, which is effective January 1, 2019, with early adoption permitted, requires virtually all leases to be recognized on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. The Company will adopt the standard effective January 1, 2019, using the modified retrospective approach, which requires recording existing operating leases on the Consolidated Balance Sheets upon adoption and in the comparative period. The Company is in the process of upgrading its existing lease administration software for new lease accounting functionality, business processes and internal controls in preparation for the adoption. Specifically, the Company is currently reviewing its lease portfolio and is evaluating and interpreting the requirements under the guidance, including the available accounting policy elections, in order to determine the impacts to the Company s financial position, results of operations and cash flows upon adoption. In June 2016, the FASB issued new accounting guidance for recognition of credit losses on financial instruments, which is effective January 1, 2020, with early adoption permitted on January 1, 2019. The guidance introduces a new credit reserving model known as the Current Expected Credit Loss (CECL) model, which is based on expected losses, and differs significantly from the incurred loss approach used today. The CECL model requires measurement of expected credit losses not only based on historical experience and current conditions, but also by including reasonable and supportable forecasts incorporating forward-looking information. The guidance requires a cumulative-effect adjustment to retained earnings as of the beginning of the reporting period of adoption. The Company does not intend to adopt the new standard early and is currently evaluating the impact the new guidance will have on its financial position, results of operations and cash flows; however, it is expected that the CECL model will alter the assumptions used in estimating credit losses on Card Member loans and receivables, among other financial instruments (e.g., investments in available-for-sale debt securities), and may result in material increases to the Company s credit reserves as the new guidance involves earlier recognition of expected losses for the life of the assets. The Company has established an enterprise-wide, cross-discipline governance structure to implement the new standard. The Company is currently identifying key interpretive issues, and is evaluating existing credit loss forecasting models and processes in relation to the new guidance to determine what modifications may be required. In August 2017, the FASB issued new accounting guidance providing targeted improvements to the accounting for hedging activities, which is effective January 1, 2019, with early adoption permitted in any interim period or fiscal year before the effective date. The guidance introduces a number of amendments, several of which are optional, that are designed to simplify the application of hedge accounting, improve financial statement transparency and more closely align hedge accounting with an entity s risk management strategies. The Company is evaluating the impact this guidance will have on its financial position, results of operations and cash flows, as well as the impact the standard will have on its accounting policies, business processes, systems and internal controls. 2. Business Events During the fourth quarter of 2015, it was determined the Company would sell the Card Member loans and receivables related to its cobrand partnerships with JetBlue Airways Corporation (JetBlue) and Costco Wholesale Corporation (Costco) in the United States (the HFS portfolios). As a result, the HFS portfolios were presented as held for sale (HFS) on the Consolidated Balance Sheets within Card Member loans and receivables HFS as of December 31, 2015. During the first half of 2016, the Company completed the sales of substantially all of its outstanding Card Member loans and receivables HFS and recognized gains, as an expense reduction, in Other expenses, of $127 million and $1.1 billion during the three months ended March 31, 2016 and June 30, 2016, respectively. The impact of the sales, including the recognition of the proceeds received and the reclassification of the retained Card Member loans and receivables, is reported within the investing section of the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows as a net decrease in Card Member receivables and loans, including HFS. From the point of classification as HFS through the sale completion dates, the Company continued to recognize discount revenue, interest income, other revenues and expenses related to the HFS portfolios in the respective line items on the Consolidated Statements of Income, with changes in the valuation of the HFS portfolios recognized in Other expenses. 7 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 3. Loans and Accounts Receivable The Company s lending and charge payment card products result in the generation of Card Member loans and Card Member receivables, respectively. Card Member loans by segment and Other loans as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016 consisted of: Card Member accounts receivable by segment and Other receivables as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016 consisted of: 8 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Card Member Loans and Card Member Receivables Aging Generally, a Card Member account is considered past due if payment is not received within 30 days after the billing statement date. The following table presents the aging of Card Member loans and receivables as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016: 9 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Credit Quality Indicators for Card Member Loans and Receivables The following tables present the key credit quality indicators as of or for the nine months ended September 30: Impaired Card Member Loans and Receivables Impaired Card Member loans and receivables are individual larger balance or homogeneous pools of smaller balance loans and receivables for which it is probable that the Company will be unable to collect all amounts due according to the original contractual terms of the Card Member agreement. In certain cases, these Card Member loans and receivables are included in one of the Company s various Troubled Debt Restructuring (TDR) modification programs. 10 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following tables provide additional information with respect to the Company s impaired Card Member loans and receivables. Impaired Card Member receivables are not significant for International Consumer and Network Services (ICNS) as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016; therefore, this segment s receivables are not included in the following tables. 11 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table provides information with respect to the Company s average balances of, and interest income recognized from, impaired Card Member loans and the average balances of impaired Card Member receivables for the three and nine months ended September 30: 12 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Card Member Loans and Receivables Modified as TDRs The following table provides additional information with respect to the U.S. Consumer Services (USCS) and GCS Card Member loans and receivables modified as TDRs for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016. The ICNS Card Member loans and receivables modifications were not significant; therefore, this segment is not included in the following TDR disclosures. 13 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table provides information with respect to the USCS and GCS Card Member loans and receivables modified as TDRs that subsequently defaulted within 12 months of modification, for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016. A Card Member is considered in default of a modification program after one and up to two missed payments, depending on the terms of the modification program. For all Card Members that defaulted from a modification program, the probability of default is factored into the reserves for Card Member loans and receivables. 14 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 4. Reserves for Losses Reserves for losses relating to Card Member loans and receivables represent management s best estimate of the probable inherent losses in the Company s outstanding portfolio of loans and receivables as of the balance sheet date. Management s evaluation process requires certain estimates and judgments. Changes in Card Member Loans Reserve for Losses The following table presents changes in the Card Member loans reserve for losses for the nine months ended September 30: Card Member Loans Evaluated Individually and Collectively for Impairment The following table presents Card Member loans evaluated individually and collectively for impairment and related reserves as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016: 15 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Changes in Card Member Receivables Reserve for Losses The following table presents changes in the Card Member receivables reserve for losses for the nine months ended September 30: Card Member Receivables Evaluated Individually and Collectively for Impairment The following table presents Card Member receivables evaluated individually and collectively for impairment, and related reserves, as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016: 5. Investment Securities Investment securities principally include debt securities the Company classifies as available-for-sale and carries at fair value on the Consolidated Balance Sheets, with unrealized gains and losses recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) (AOCI), net of income taxes. Realized gains and losses are recognized upon disposition of the securities using the specific identification method. The following is a summary of investment securities as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016: 16 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table provides information about the Company s investment securities with gross unrealized losses and the length of time that individual securities have been in a continuous unrealized loss position as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016: The following table summarizes the gross unrealized losses due to temporary impairments by ratio of fair value to amortized cost as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016: The gross unrealized losses are attributed to overall wider credit spreads for specific issuers, adverse changes in market benchmark interest rates, or a combination thereof, all compared to those prevailing when the investment securities were acquired. Overall, for the investment securities in gross unrealized loss positions, (i) the Company does not intend to sell the investment securities, (ii) it is more likely than not that the Company will not be required to sell the investment securities before recovery of the unrealized losses, and (iii) the Company expects that the contractual principal and interest will be received on the investment securities. As a result, the Company recognized no other-than-temporary impairment during the periods presented. Contractual maturities for investment securities with stated maturities as of September 30, 2017 were as follows: The expected payments on state and municipal obligations and mortgage-backed securities may not coincide with their contractual maturities because the issuers have the right to call or prepay certain obligations. 17 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 6. Asset Securitizations The Company periodically securitizes Card Member loans and receivables arising from its card businesses through the transfer of those assets to securitization trusts. The trusts then issue debt securities collateralized by the transferred assets to third-party investors. The following table provides information on the restricted cash held by the American Express Credit Account Master Trust (the Lending Trust) and the American Express Issuance Trust II (the Charge Trust, collectively the Trusts) as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016, included in Other assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets: These amounts relate to collections of Card Member loans and receivables to be used by the Trusts to fund future expenses and obligations, including interest on debt securities, credit losses and upcoming debt maturities. The Company performs the servicing and key decision making for the Trusts, and therefore has the power to direct the activities that most significantly impact the Trusts economic performance, which are the collection of the underlying Card Member loans and receivables. In addition, the Company holds all of the variable interests in both Trusts, with the exception of the debt securities issued to third-party investors. As of September 30, 2017, the Company s ownership of variable interests was $10.7 billion for the Lending Trust and $6.5 billion for the Charge Trust. These variable interests held by the Company provide it with the right to receive benefits and the obligation to absorb losses, which could be significant to both the Lending Trust and the Charge Trust. Based on these considerations, the Company is the primary beneficiary of both Trusts and therefore consolidates both Trusts. Under the respective terms of the Lending Trust and the Charge Trust agreements, the occurrence of certain triggering events associated with the performance of the assets of each Trust could result in payment of trust expenses, establishment of reserve funds, or, in a worst-case scenario, early amortization of debt securities. During the nine months ended September 30, 2017 and the year ended December 31, 2016, no such triggering events occurred. 18 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 7. Customer Deposits As of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016, customer deposits were categorized as interest bearing or non-interest bearing as follows: Customer deposits by deposit type as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016 were as follows: The scheduled maturities of certificates of deposit as of September 30, 2017 were as follows: As of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016, certificates of deposit in denominations of $250,000 or more, in the aggregate, were as follows: 19 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 8. Contingencies In the ordinary course of business, the Company and its subsidiaries are subject to various pending and potential legal actions, arbitration proceedings, claims, investigations, examinations, information gathering requests, subpoenas, inquiries and matters relating to compliance with laws and regulations (collectively, legal proceedings). The Company discloses its material legal proceedings under Part II, Item 1. Legal Proceedings in this Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q and Part I, Item 3. Legal Proceedings in the Annual Report. In addition to the matters disclosed under Legal Proceedings, the Company is being challenged in a number of countries regarding its application of value-added taxes (VAT) to certain of its international transactions, which are in various stages of audit, or are being contested in legal actions (collectively, VAT matters). While the Company believes it has complied with all applicable tax laws, rules and regulations in the relevant jurisdictions, the tax authorities may determine that the Company owes additional VAT. In certain jurisdictions where the Company is contesting the assessments, it was required to pay the VAT assessments prior to contesting. The Company s legal proceedings range from cases brought by a single plaintiff to class actions with millions of putative class members. These legal proceedings involve various lines of business of the Company and a variety of claims (including, but not limited to, common law tort, contract, application of tax laws, antitrust and consumer protection claims), some of which present novel factual allegations and/or unique legal theories. While some matters pending against the Company specify the damages claimed by the plaintiff or class, many seek an unspecified amount of damages or are at very early stages of the legal process. Even when the amount of damages claimed against the Company are stated, the claimed amount may be exaggerated and/or unsupported. As a result, some matters have not yet progressed sufficiently through discovery and/or development of important factual information and legal issues to enable the Company to estimate an amount of loss or a range of possible loss, while other matters have progressed sufficiently such that the Company is able to estimate an amount of loss or a range of possible loss. The Company has recorded reserves for certain of its outstanding legal proceedings. A reserve is recorded when it is both (a) probable that a loss has occurred and (b) the amount of loss can be reasonably estimated. There may be instances in which an exposure to loss exceeds the recorded reserve. The Company evaluates, on a quarterly basis, developments in legal proceedings that could cause an increase or decrease in the amount of the reserve that has been previously recorded, or a revision to the disclosed estimated range of possible losses, as applicable. For those disclosed material legal proceedings and VAT matters where a loss is reasonably possible in future periods, whether in excess of a related reserve for legal or tax contingencies or where there is no such reserve, and for which the Company is able to estimate a range of possible loss, the current estimated range is zero to $500 million in excess of any reserves related to those matters. This range represents management s estimate based on currently available information and does not represent the Company s maximum loss exposure; actual results may vary significantly. As such legal proceedings evolve, the Company may need to increase its range of possible loss or reserves. Based on its current knowledge, and taking into consideration its litigation-related liabilities, the Company believes it is not a party to, nor are any of its properties the subject of, any legal proceeding that would have a material adverse effect on the Company s consolidated financial condition or liquidity. However, in light of the uncertainties involved in such matters, it is possible that the outcome of legal proceedings, including the possible resolution of merchant claims, could have a material impact on the Company s results of operations. 20 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 9. Derivatives and Hedging Activities The Company uses derivative financial instruments (derivatives) to manage exposures to various market risks. These instruments derive their value from an underlying variable or multiple variables, including interest rates, foreign exchange rates, and equity index or price, and are carried at fair value on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. These instruments enable end users to increase, reduce or alter exposure to various market risks and, for that reason, are an integral component of the Company s market risk management. The Company does not transact in derivatives for trading purposes. In relation to the Company s credit risk, under the terms of the derivative agreements it has with its various counterparties, the Company is not required to either immediately settle any outstanding liability balances or post collateral upon the occurrence of a specified credit risk-related event. Based on its assessment of the credit risk of the Company s derivative counterparties as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016, no credit risk adjustment to the derivative portfolio was required. The following table summarizes the total fair value, excluding interest accruals, of derivative assets and liabilities as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016: A majority of the Company s derivative assets and liabilities as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016 are subject to master netting agreements with its derivative counterparties. The Company has no derivative amounts subject to enforceable master netting arrangements that are not offset on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Fair Value Hedges The Company is exposed to interest rate risk associated with its fixed-rate long-term debt obligations. At the time of issuance, certain fixed-rate debt obligations are designated in fair value hedging relationships, using interest rate swaps, to economically convert the fixed interest rate to a floating interest rate. The Company has $20.7 billion and $17.7 billion of fixed-rate debt obligations designated in fair value hedging relationships as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016, respectively. 21 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table summarizes the gains (losses) recognized in Other expenses associated with the Company s fair value hedges for the three and nine months ended September 30: The Company also recognized a net reduction in interest expense on long-term debt of $24 million and $55 million for the three months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016, respectively, and $105 million and $173 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016, respectively, primarily related to the net settlements (interest accruals) on the Company s interest rate derivatives designated as fair value hedges. Net Investment Hedges The effective portion of the gain or loss on net investment hedges, net of taxes, recorded in AOCI as part of the cumulative translation adjustment, were losses of $184 million and $18 million for the three months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016, respectively, and a loss of $515 million and a gain of $25 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016, respectively, with any ineffective portion recognized in Other expenses during the period. The net hedge ineffectiveness recognized was nil for both the three and nine months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016. Other amounts related to foreign exchange contracts reclassified from AOCI into Other expenses included a loss of $18 million and nil for the three months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016, respectively, and a loss of $18 million and a gain of $5 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016, respectively. Derivatives Not Designated as Hedges The changes in the fair value of derivatives that are not designated as hedges are intended to offset the related foreign exchange gains or losses of the underlying foreign currency exposures. The changes in the fair value of the derivatives and the related underlying foreign currency exposures resulted in net losses of $15 million and $4 million for the three months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016, respectively, and net losses of $36 million and $12 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016, respectively, and are recognized in Other expenses. The changes in the fair value of an embedded derivative resulted in gains of $1 million for both the three months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016, and a loss of $1 million and a gain of $7 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016, respectively, which are recognized in Card Member services and other expense. 10. Fair Values Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities Carried at Fair Value The following table summarizes the Company s financial assets and financial liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis, categorized by GAAP s fair value hierarchy, as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016: 22 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities Carried at Other Than Fair Value The following table summarizes the estimated fair values of the Company s financial assets and financial liabilities that are not required to be carried at fair value on a recurring basis, as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016. The fair values of these financial instruments are estimates based upon the market conditions and perceived risks as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016, and require management s judgment. These figures may not be indicative of future fair values, nor can the fair value of the Company be estimated by aggregating the amounts presented. Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements The Company has certain assets that are subject to measurement at fair value on a nonrecurring basis. For these assets, measurement at fair value in periods subsequent to their initial recognition is applicable if determined to be impaired. During the nine months ended September 30, 2017 and during the year ended December 31, 2016, the Company did not have any material assets that were measured at fair value due to impairment. 23 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 11. Guarantees The Company provides Card Member protection plans that cover losses associated with purchased products, as well as certain guarantees and indemnifications in the ordinary course of business. As of September 30, 2017, the maximum potential undiscounted future payments and related liability resulting from these arrangements were $1 billion and $54 million, respectively, and related primarily to the Company s real estate and business dispositions. As of December 31, 2016, the maximum potential undiscounted future payments and related liability were $48 billion and $86 million, respectively. Amounts related to the Company s Card Member protection plans were included as of December 31, 2016, in addition to its real estate and business dispositions. To date the Company has not experienced any significant losses related to guarantees or indemnifications. The Company s recognition of these instruments is at fair value. In addition, the Company establishes reserves when a loss is probable and the amount can be reasonably estimated. 12. Changes In Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income AOCI is comprised of items that have not been recognized in earnings but may be recognized in earnings in the future when certain events occur. Changes in each component for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016 were as follows: (a) Includes $289 million of recognized tax benefits (Refer to Note 14). 24 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table shows the tax impact for the three and nine months ended September 30 for the changes in each component of AOCI presented above: (a) Includes $289 million of tax benefits recognized in the nine months ended September 30, 2017 (Refer to Note 14). 25 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table presents the effects of reclassifications out of AOCI and into the Consolidated Statements of Income: 13. Non-Interest Revenue and Expense Detail The following is a detail of Other fees and commissions: The following is a detail of Other revenues: 26 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following is a detail of Other expenses: 14. Income Taxes The effective tax rate was 25.8 percent and 34.2 percent for the three months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016, respectively, and 29.7 percent and 33.9 percent for the nine months ended September 30, 2017 and 2016, respectively. The changes in tax rates in both periods primarily reflected the realization of certain foreign tax credits and the geographic mix of business, and additionally in the nine month period, the resolution of certain prior years tax items. The Company is under continuous examination by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) and tax authorities in other countries and states in which the Company has significant business operations. The tax years under examination and open for examination vary by jurisdiction. In February 2017, the Company received notification that all matters outstanding with the IRS for tax years 1997-2007 were resolved. The resolution of such matters did not have a material impact on the Company s effective tax rate. The Company is currently under examination with the IRS for tax years 2008 through 2014. The Company believes it is reasonably possible that its unrecognized tax benefits could decrease within the next 12 months by as much as $307 million, principally as a result of potential resolutions of prior years tax items with various taxing authorities. The prior years tax items include unrecognized tax benefits relating to the deductibility of certain expenses or losses and the attribution of taxable income to a particular jurisdiction or jurisdictions. Of the $307 million of unrecognized tax benefits, approximately $257 million relates to amounts that, if recognized, would impact the effective tax rate in a future period. During the nine months ended September 30, 2017, the Company s unrecognized tax benefits decreased by $253 million. The decrease was primarily due to the resolution with the IRS of an uncertain tax position in January 2017, which resulted in the recognition of $289 million in shareholders equity, specifically within AOCI. 27 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 15. Earnings Per Common Share (EPS) The computations of basic and diluted EPS were as follows: 28 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 16. Reportable Operating Segments The Company is a global services company that is principally engaged in businesses comprising four reportable operating segments: USCS, ICNS, GCS and Global Merchant Services (GMS). Corporate functions and certain other businesses and operations are included in Corporate Other. The following table presents certain selected financial information for the Company s reportable operating segments and Corporate Other: 29 Table of Contents Business Introduction When we use the terms American Express, the Company, we, our or us, we mean American Express Company and its subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, unless we state or the context implies otherwise. We are a global services company with four reportable operating segments: U.S. Consumer Services (USCS), International Consumer and Network Services (ICNS), Global Commercial Services (GCS) and Global Merchant Services (GMS). Corporate functions and certain other businesses and operations are included in Corporate Other. We provide our customers with access to products, insights and experiences that enrich lives and build business success. Our principal products and services are charge and credit payment card products and travel-related services offered to consumers and businesses around the world. Our range of products and services includes: Charge card, credit card and other payment and financing products Network services Merchant acquisition and processing, servicing and settlement, marketing and point-of-sale marketing and information products and services for merchants Other fee services, including fraud prevention services and the design and operation of customer loyalty programs Expense management products and services Travel-related services Stored-value/prepaid products Our various products and services are sold globally to diverse customer groups, including consumers, small businesses, mid-sized companies and large corporations. These products and services are sold through various channels, including online applications, direct mail, in-house teams, third-party vendors and direct response advertising. Business travel-related services are offered through our non-consolidated joint venture, American Express Global Business Travel (the GBT JV). We compete in the global payments industry with charge, credit and debit card networks, issuers and acquirers, paper-based transactions (e.g., cash and checks), bank transfer models (e.g., wire transfers and ACH), as well as evolving and growing alternative payment and financing providers. As the payments industry continues to evolve, we face increasing competition from non-traditional players that leverage new technologies and customer relationships to create payment or financing solutions. The following types of revenue are generated from our various products and services: 30 Table of Contents Forward-Looking Statements and Non-GAAP Measures Certain of the statements in this Form 10-Q are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Refer to the Cautionary Note Regarding Forward-Looking Statements section. We prepare our Consolidated Financial Statements in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America (GAAP). However, certain information included within this Form 10-Q constitutes non-GAAP financial measures. Our calculations of non-GAAP financial measures may differ from the calculations of similarly titled measures by other companies. Bank Holding Company American Express Company is a bank holding company under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 and The Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (the Federal Reserve) is our primary federal regulator. As such, we are subject to the Federal Reserve s regulations, policies and minimum capital standards. Business Environment Our results for the third quarter reflect significant progress against our current priorities of accelerating revenue growth, optimizing investments and resetting the cost base. During the quarter, revenue and earnings performance was strong across our business segments and we continued to invest in new products and benefits, maintaining high levels of new card acquisitions and expanding our merchant network. In addition, our strong balance sheet position allowed us to continue to return a significant amount of capital to shareholders through share repurchases and dividends. Our worldwide billed business increased 8 percent over the prior year, reflecting growth across our diverse customer segments and geographies. Our U.S. and international proprietary card issuing businesses saw a modest acceleration in billings growth in the current quarter. We also continued to see strong performance from middle market and small business customers, while large and global commercial customers continued to grow at a more modest pace. Billed business growth for Global Network Services slowed slightly from last quarter as a result of the impact of the evolving regulatory environment in Europe and Australia. Revenues net of interest expense grew year-over-year primarily due to strong growth in billed business and an increase in net interest income. Our net interest yield increased year-over-year primarily related to a shift in mix towards non-cobrand lending products that generally attract more revolving loan balances, a lower percentage of total loans at introductory interest rates, specific pricing actions and a benefit from increases in benchmark interest rates. We expect the net interest yield to stabilize over time and, as a result, we expect the growth in net interest income to moderate. Card Member loan and receivables growth was strong year-over-year, as we continue to expand our relationships with existing customers and acquire new Card Members. Provisions for losses increased as a result of higher Card Member loans and receivables, expected increases in delinquencies and net write-off rates, and a small reserve build related to recent hurricanes. The increases in the delinquency and net write-off rates were primarily due to the seasoning of recent loan vintages and a shift in mix towards non-cobrand lending products, which have higher write-off rates. We expect, as a result of these trends, provisions for losses will continue to grow faster than loans. Spending on Card Member engagement (the aggregate of rewards, Card Member services and marketing and promotion expenses) increased year-over-year and primarily reflected the recent enhancements to rewards on our U.S. Platinum products, continued strong growth in our Delta cobrand portfolio and higher levels of engagement in many of our premium services. Marketing and promotion expenses decreased, as we realized efficiencies in our marketing spend. Year-over-year operating expenses were flat. In the third quarter of 2017, we incurred impairment and other charges related to our US loyalty coalition and US prepaid businesses. Excluding these charges and a restructuring charge in the prior year, adjusted operating expenses decreased year-over-year, reflecting progress against our cost reduction initiatives. Our effective tax rate for the quarter was 26 percent, down from 34 percent a year ago, primarily due to the realization of certain foreign tax credits in the current year and a continuing shift in the geographic mix of earnings. Going forward, we estimate our ongoing tax rate will be approximately 32%, although the effective tax rate in any given period can be further impacted by discrete tax items as we saw in the current quarter. 31 Table of Contents Our third quarter results continue to reflect the diverse sources of growth across our business segments and geographies. The momentum seen in our results throughout 2017 reflects the investments we have made in a variety of growth opportunities over the last several years. Although we have some headwinds from regulation in markets around the world and intense competition, we remain focused on delivering differentiated value to our merchants, customers and business partners, while delivering appropriate returns to our shareholders. On October 18, 2017, we announced that the Board of Directors appointed Stephen J. Squeri Chief Executive Officer of American Express Company and elected him Chairman of the Board, each effective February 1, 2018. Mr. Squeri succeeds Kenneth I. Chenault, who will retire as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer on that date. Mr. Squeri joined American Express in 1985 and in his current role serves as Vice Chairman. See Part II, Item 5. Other Information for further detail. See Certain legislative, regulatory and other developments in Other Matters for information on legislative and regulatory changes that could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations and financial condition. 32 Table of Contents American Express Company Consolidated Results of Operations Refer to the Glossary of Selected Terminology for the definitions of certain key terms and related information appearing within this section. Effective December 1, 2015, we transferred the Card Member loans and receivables related to our cobrand partnerships with Costco Wholesale Corporation (Costco) and JetBlue Airways Corporation (JetBlue) (collectively, the HFS portfolios) to Card Member loans and receivables held for sale (HFS) on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. On March 18, 2016 and June 17, 2016, we completed the sales of the JetBlue and Costco cobrand card portfolios, respectively. For the periods from December 1, 2015, through the sale completion dates, the primary impacts beyond the HFS classification on the Consolidated Balance Sheets were to provisions for losses and credit metrics, which do not reflect amounts related to these HFS loans and receivables, as credit costs were reported in Other expenses through a valuation allowance adjustment. Other, non-credit related metrics (i.e., billed business, cards-in-force, net interest yield) reflect amounts related to the HFS portfolios through the sale completion dates. Additionally, for periods after the sale completion dates, activities associated with these cobrand partnerships and the HFS portfolios are no longer included in our Consolidated Results of Operations. Specifically, these impacts include: Discount revenue from Costco in the United States for spend on all American Express cards and from other merchants for spend on the Costco cobrand card; Other fees and commissions and Interest income from Costco cobrand Card Members; and Card Member rewards expense related to the Costco cobrand card, resulting in a lack of comparability between 2017 and 2016 in the first half of the year. The discussions in both the Consolidated Results of Operations and Business Segment Results provide commentary on the variances for the three and nine month periods ended September 30, 2017 compared to same periods in the prior year, as presented in the accompanying tables. Table 1: Summary of Financial Performance Table 2: Total Revenue Net of Interest Expense Summary 33 Table of Contents Total Revenues Net of Interest Expense Discount revenue increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily due to growth in billed business of 8 percent and 3 percent for the three and nine month periods, respectively, partially offset by a decrease in the average discount rate and increases in contra-discount revenues. The increase in contra-discount revenue was primarily due to higher corporate client incentives and cobrand partner payments, both driven by higher volumes. U.S. billed business increased 7 percent and decreased 1 percent for the three and nine month periods respectively. Non-U.S. billed business increased 10 percent and 11 percent for the three and nine month periods, respectively. See Tables 5, 6 and 7 for more details on billed business performance. The decreases in the average discount rate for both the three and nine month periods primarily reflected changes in industry and geographic mix, rate pressure from merchant negotiations, including those resulting from the recent regulatory changes affecting competitor pricing in certain international markets, and the continued growth of the OptBlue program. We expect the average discount rate will likely continue to decline over time due to a greater shift of existing merchants into OptBlue, merchant negotiations and competition, volume related pricing discounts, certain pricing initiatives mainly driven by pricing regulation (including regulation of competitors interchange rates) and other factors. Net card fees increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by growth in the Platinum and Delta portfolios as well as growth in certain key international markets. Other fees and commissions increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by an increase in delinquency fees due to a change in certain U.S. charge card portfolios late fee assessment date. Other revenues decreased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by revenues related to our Loyalty Edge business in the prior year, and additionally in the nine month period, a contractual payment from a GNS partner in the prior year. Interest income increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by growth in average Card Member loans and higher yields in the current year. The increase in yields was primarily driven by a mix shift towards non-cobrand lending products, where Card Members tend to revolve more of their loan balances, as well as a lower percentage of loans at introductory rates, specific pricing actions, and a benefit from increases in benchmark interest rates. Interest expense increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by marginally higher interest rates and higher average long-term debt. Table 3: Provisions for Losses Summary # Denotes a variance greater than 100 percent. Provisions for Losses Charge card provision for losses increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by growth in receivables due to charge volume and higher net write-offs. Card Member loans provision for losses increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by strong loan growth, as well as increases in delinquencies and net write-off rates, primarily due to the seasoning of recent loan vintages and a shift in mix towards non-cobrand lending products, which have higher write-off rates. Other provision for losses increased for the three month period and decreased for the nine month period. The increase in the three month period was primarily due to growth in the non-card lending portfolio, which was more than offset in the nine month period by improving credit performance in the commercial financing portfolio. 34 Table of Contents Table 4: Expenses Summary Expenses Marketing and promotion expenses decreased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily due to lower spending on growth initiatives. Card Member rewards expenses increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by increases in Membership Rewards expense of $202 million and cobrand rewards expense of $132 million for the three month period and an increase in Membership Rewards expense of $674 million partially offset by a decrease in cobrand rewards expense of $75 million for the nine month period. The increases in Membership Rewards expense were primarily driven by enhancements to U.S. Consumer and Small Business Platinum rewards and higher spending volumes. The increase in cobrand rewards expense in the three month period reflected growth in spending volumes across cobrand card products, which was more than offset in the nine month period by the impact of Costco-related expenses in the prior year. The Membership Rewards Ultimate Redemption Rate (URR) for current program participants was 95 percent (rounded down) at both September 30, 2017 and 2016. Card Member services and other expenses increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by higher usage of travel-related benefits and the enhanced Platinum card benefits. Salaries and employee benefits expenses were flat for the three month period and decreased for the nine month period. The decrease in the nine month period reflected higher restructuring charges in the prior year and benefits from our cost reduction initiatives in the current year. Other expenses were flat for the three month period and increased for the nine month period. The three month period results were primarily driven by lower technology-related costs in the current year and Loyalty Edge-related costs included in the prior year, offset by current-year charges related to our U.S. loyalty coalition and prepaid businesses. The increase in the nine month period was primarily driven by the prior-year gains on the sale of the HFS portfolios, partially offset by the previously mentioned lower technology-related costs in the current year and Loyalty Edge-related costs in the prior year. Income Taxes The effective tax rate decreased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily reflecting the realization of certain foreign tax credits and the geographic mix of business, and additionally in the nine month period, the resolution of certain prior years tax items. 35 Table of Contents Table 5: Selected Card-Related Statistical Information 36 Table of Contents Table 6: Billed Business Growth 37 Table of Contents Table 7: Billed Business Growth 38 Table of Contents Table 8: Selected Credit-Related Statistical Information # Denotes a variance greater than 100 percent. 39 Table of Contents Table 9: Net Interest Yield on Card Member Loans 40 Table of Contents Business Segment Results U.S. Consumer Services Table 10: USCS Selected Income Statement Data USCS issues a wide range of proprietary consumer cards and provides services to consumers in the United States, including consumer travel services. Non-interest revenues increased for the three month period and decreased for the nine month period, primarily driven by discount revenue, which increased $74 million for the three month period, reflecting an increase in billed business of 6 percent, and decreased $251 million for the nine month period, reflecting a decrease in billed business of 6 percent. The decreases in both discount revenue and billed business in the nine month period were driven by Costco-related volumes included in the prior year. Net card fees and other fees and commissions increased in both periods driven primarily by growth in the Platinum and Delta portfolios and higher delinquency fees, respectively. Net interest income increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by growth in average Card Member loans and higher yields, partially offset by higher interest expense, primarily driven by marginally higher cost of funds. Provisions for losses increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by Card Member loans provision, which increased $168 million and $345 million in the three and nine month periods, respectively, due to strong loan growth, as well as increases in delinquencies and higher net write-off rates primarily due to the seasoning of recent loan vintages and a shift in mix towards non-cobrand lending products, which have higher write-off rates. Marketing, promotion, rewards, Card Member services and other expenses increased for both the three and nine month periods, reflecting higher Card Member rewards and Card Member services and other expenses in both periods, partially offset by lower marketing and promotion expenses in both periods. Card Member rewards expense increased $168 million and $123 million for the three and nine month periods, respectively, primarily driven by enhancements to Platinum rewards and increased spending volumes, partially offset in the nine month period by Costco-related expenses in the prior year. Card Member services and other expenses increased $48 million and $104 million for the three and nine month periods, respectively, driven by higher usage of travel-related benefits and enhanced Platinum card benefits. Marketing and promotion expenses decreased $50 million and $12 million for the three and nine month periods, respectively, due to lower spending on growth initiatives. 41 Table of Contents Salaries and employee benefits and other operating expenses decreased for the three month period and increased for the nine month period. The decrease in the three month period was primarily driven by lower technology and other servicing-related costs in the current year and the prior year HFS valuation allowance adjustment and restructuring charges. All of these impacts were more than offset in the nine month period by the prior-year gain on the sale of the Costco HFS portfolio. The effective tax rate was lower for both the three and nine month periods, primarily reflecting the level of pretax income in relation to recurring permanent tax benefits. 42 Table of Contents Table 11: USCS Selected Statistical Information 43 Table of Contents International Consumer and Network Services Table 12: ICNS Selected Income Statement Data ICNS issues a wide range of proprietary consumer cards outside the United States and enters into partnership agreements with third-party card issuers and acquirers, licensing the American Express brand and extending the reach of the global network. It also provides travel services to consumers outside the United States. Non-interest revenues increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by higher discount revenue in both periods, due to an increase in proprietary billed business, as well as higher net card fees, partially offset in the nine month period by a prior-year contractual payment from a GNS partner. Total billed business increased, for both the three and nine months, reflecting higher cards-in-force and average spend per card. Refer to Tables 6, 7 and 13 for additional information on billed business. Net interest income increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by higher average loan balances and higher yields. Provisions for losses increased for both the three and nine month periods due to strong growth in both Card Member receivables and loans, as well as an increase in net write-off rates. Marketing, promotion, rewards, Card Member services and other expenses increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by higher Card Member rewards expense due to higher spending volumes, partially offset by lower marketing and promotion expenses in part due to lower spending on growth initiatives. Salaries and employee benefits and other operating expenses decreased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by lower salaries and employee benefits costs, including restructuring charges in the prior year, partially offset in the nine month period by higher technology and other servicing-related costs. The effective tax rates decreased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily reflecting the allocated share of tax benefits related to the realization of certain foreign tax credits and the geographic mix of business, and additionally in the nine month period, the allocated share of tax benefits related to the resolution of certain prior years tax items. In addition, the effective tax rate in all periods reflected the impact of recurring permanent tax benefits both in relation to the segment s ongoing funding activities outside the United States, which is allocated to ICNS under our internal tax allocation process, and on varying levels of pretax income. 44 Table of Contents Table 13: ICNS Selected Statistical Information 45 Table of Contents Global Commercial Services Table 14: GCS Selected Income Statement Data GCS issues a wide range of proprietary corporate and small business cards and provides payment and expense management services globally. In addition, GCS provides commercial financing products. Non-interest revenues increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by higher discount revenue due to increases in billed business, partially offset by increased contra-discount revenue driven by higher client incentives. The increase in non-interest revenues, in both periods, was also driven by higher net card fees and higher other fees and commissions, primarily due to growth in the U.S. small business Platinum portfolio and higher delinquency fees, respectively. Net interest income increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by an increase in average Card Member loans and higher yields, partially offset by higher interest expense, reflecting an increase in the cost of funds. Provisions for losses increased for both the three and nine month periods due to growth in both Card Member receivables and loans, as well as increases in net write-off and delinquency rates, all of which were partially offset in the nine month period by improving credit performance in the commercial financing portfolio. Marketing, promotion, rewards, Card Member services and other expenses increased for both the three and nine month periods, driven by higher Card Member rewards expenses, which increased $120 million and $366 million for the three and nine month periods, respectively, partially offset by declines in marketing and promotion expenses in the same respective periods. The higher Card Member rewards expenses were primarily driven by enhancements to Platinum rewards and higher spending volumes, partially offset in the nine month period by Costco-related expenses in the prior year. Salaries and employee benefits and other operating expenses decreased for the three month period and was relatively flat for the nine month period, primarily driven by lower technology and other servicing-related costs in the current year and the prior year HFS valuation allowance adjustment and restructuring charges, all of which were offset in the nine month period by the prior-year gain on the sale of the Costco HFS portfolio. The effective tax rate was lower for both the three and nine months, primarily reflecting the geographic mix of business. 46 Table of Contents Table 15: GCS Selected Statistical Information 47 Table of Contents Global Merchant Services Table 16: GMS Selected Income Statement Data GMS operates a global payments network that processes and settles proprietary and non-proprietary card transactions. GMS acquires merchants and provides multi-channel marketing programs and capabilities, services and data analytics, leveraging our global closed-loop network. GMS also operates loyalty coalition businesses in certain countries around the world. Non-interest revenues increased for the three month period and were relatively flat for the nine month period, primarily driven by discount revenue, which increased and was relatively flat for the same respective periods. The discount revenue increase in the three month period was driven by billed business growth and an increase in loyalty coalition revenues, both of which were offset in the nine month period by Costco-related revenues in the prior year. Marketing, promotion, rewards, Card Member services and other expenses decreased for both the three and nine month periods, reflecting lower levels of spending on growth initiatives. Salaries and employee benefits and other operating expenses increased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily driven by charges related to the U.S. loyalty coalition business in the current quarter, partially offset by a benefit from a change in the liability related to non-delivery of goods and services by merchants and growth of the OptBlue program, which does not entail merchant acquirer payments. The effective tax rate decreased for both the three and nine month periods, primarily reflecting the allocated share of tax benefits related to the realization of certain foreign tax credits and the geographic mix of business. 48 Table of Contents Table 17: GMS Selected Statistical Information Corporate Other Corporate functions and certain other businesses, including our Prepaid Services business and other operations, are included in Corporate Other. Corporate Other net expense increased to $302 million for the three month period, compared to $239 million in the same period a year ago and increased to $772 million for the nine month period compared to $766 million in the same period a year ago. The increase in the three month period was driven in part by charges related to the U.S. prepaid business, which were partially offset in the nine month period by prior-year restructuring charges. Results for both periods included net interest expense related to maintaining the liquidity requirements discussed in Consolidated Capital Resources and Liquidity Liquidity Management, as well as interest expense related to other corporate indebtedness. 49 Table of Contents CONSOLIDATED CAPITAL RESOURCES AND LIQUIDITY Our balance sheet management objectives are to maintain: Transitional Basel III The following table presents our regulatory risk-based capital ratios and leverage ratios and those of our significant bank subsidiaries, American Express Centurion Bank (Centurion Bank) and American Express Bank, FSB (American Express Bank), as of September 30, 2017. Table 18: Regulatory Risk-Based Capital and Leverage Ratios Table 19: Regulatory Risk-Based Capital Components and Risk Weighted Assets 50 Table of Contents We seek to maintain capital levels and ratios in excess of the minimum regulatory requirements and finance such capital in a cost efficient manner; failure to maintain minimum capital levels could affect our status as a financial holding company and cause the regulatory agencies with oversight of American Express, Centurion Bank and American Express Bank to take actions that could limit our business operations. Our primary source of equity capital has been the generation of net income. Historically, capital generated through net income and other sources, such as the exercise of stock options by employees, has exceeded the annual growth in our capital requirements. To the extent capital has exceeded business, regulatory and rating agency requirements, we have historically returned excess capital to shareholders through our regular common share dividend and share repurchase program. We maintain certain flexibility to shift capital across our businesses as appropriate. For example, we may infuse additional capital into subsidiaries to maintain capital at targeted levels in consideration of debt ratings and regulatory requirements. These infused amounts can affect the capital profile and liquidity levels at the American Express parent company level. We do not currently intend or foresee a need to shift capital from non-U.S. subsidiaries with permanently reinvested earnings to a U.S. parent company. The following are definitions for our regulatory risk-based capital ratios and leverage ratio, which are calculated as per standard regulatory guidance: Risk-Weighted Assets Assets are weighted for risk according to a formula used by the Federal Reserve to conform to capital adequacy guidelines. On- and off-balance sheet items are weighted for risk, with off-balance sheet items converted to balance sheet equivalents, using risk conversion factors, before being allocated a risk-adjusted weight. Off-balance sheet exposures comprise a minimal part of the total risk-weighted assets. Common Equity Tier 1 Risk-Based Capital Ratio Calculated as Common Equity Tier 1 capital (CET1), divided by risk-weighted assets. CET1 is the sum of common shareholders equity, adjusted for ineligible goodwill and intangible assets, certain deferred tax assets, as well as certain other comprehensive income items as follows: net unrealized gains/losses on securities and derivatives, and net unrealized pension and other postretirement benefit/losses, all net of tax and subject to transition provisions. Tier 1 Risk-Based Capital Ratio Calculated as Tier 1 capital divided by risk-weighted assets. Tier 1 capital is the sum of CET1, our perpetual preferred stock and third-party non-controlling interests in consolidated subsidiaries adjusted for capital held by insurance subsidiaries and deferred tax assets from net operating losses not deducted from CET1. The minimum requirement for the Tier 1 risk-based capital ratio is 1.5 percent higher than the minimum for the CET1 risk-based capital ratio. We have $1.6 billion of preferred shares outstanding to help address a portion of the Tier 1 capital requirements in excess of common equity requirements. Total Risk-Based Capital Ratio Calculated as the sum of Tier 1 capital and Tier 2 capital, divided by risk-weighted assets. Tier 2 capital is the sum of the allowance for loan and receivable losses (limited to 1.25 percent of risk-weighted assets), a portion of the unrealized gains on equity securities and $600 million of subordinated notes, adjusted for capital held by insurance subsidiaries. Tier 1 Leverage Ratio Calculated by dividing Tier 1 capital by our average total consolidated assets for the most recent quarter. Supplementary Leverage Ratio Calculated by dividing Tier 1 capital by total leverage exposure under Basel III. Leverage exposure, which reflects average total consolidated assets with adjustments for Tier 1 capital deductions, average off-balance sheet derivatives exposures, securities purchased under agreements to resell and credit equivalents of undrawn commitments that are both conditionally and unconditionally cancellable. Fully Phased-in Basel III Basel III, when fully phased in, will require bank holding companies and their bank subsidiaries to maintain more capital than prior requirements, with a greater emphasis on common equity. The following table presents our estimates for our regulatory risk-based capital ratios and leverage ratios had Basel III been fully phased in as of September 30, 2017. These ratios are calculated using the standardized approach for determining risk-weighted assets. We are currently taking steps toward Basel III advanced approaches implementation in the United States. We believe the presentation of these ratios is helpful to investors by showing the impact of future regulatory capital standards on our capital and leverage ratios. 51 Table of Contents Table 20: Estimated Fully Phased-in Basel III Capital and Leverage Ratios The following table presents a comparison of our CET1 and Tier 1 risk-based capital under Transitional Basel III rules to our estimated CET1 and Tier 1 risk-based capital under Fully Phased-in Basel III rules as of September 30, 2017. Table 21: Transitional Basel III versus Fully Phased-in Basel III Fully Phased-in Basel III Risk-Weighted Assets Reflects our Basel III risk-weighted assets, with all transition provisions fully phased in. This includes incremental risk weighting applied to deferred tax assets and significant investments in unconsolidated financial institutions, as well as exposures to past due accounts, equities and sovereigns. Fully Phased-in Basel III Tier 1 Leverage Ratio Calculated by dividing Fully Phased-in Basel III Tier 1 capital by our average total consolidated assets. Fully Phased-in Basel III Supplementary Leverage Ratio Calculated by dividing Fully Phased-in Basel III Tier 1 capital by our Fully Phased-in total leverage exposure for supplementary leverage ratio purposes under Fully Phased-in Basel III. Share Repurchases and Dividends We return capital to common shareholders through dividends and share repurchases. The share repurchases reduce common shares outstanding and more than offset the issuance of new shares as part of employee compensation plans. During the three and nine months ended September 30, 2017, we returned $1.6 billion and $3.9 billion, respectively, to our shareholders in the form of common stock dividends ($0.3 billion and $0.9 billion, respectively) and share repurchases ($1.3 billion and $3.0 billion, respectively). We repurchased 15 million common shares at an average price of $86.08 in the third quarter of 2017. These dividend and share repurchase amounts collectively represent approximately 115 percent and 97 percent of total capital generated during the three and nine-month periods, respectively. 52 Table of Contents In addition, during the three months ended September 30, 2017, we had $750 million of non-cumulative perpetual preferred shares (the Series B Preferred Shares ) and $850 million of non-cumulative perpetual preferred shares (the Series C Preferred Shares ) outstanding. Dividends declared and paid on Series C Preferred Shares during the third quarter of 2017 were $21 million. Funding Strategy Our principal funding objective is to maintain broad and well-diversified funding sources to allow us to meet our maturing obligations, cost-effectively finance current and future asset growth in our global businesses as well as to maintain a strong liquidity profile. Summary of Consolidated Debt We had the following consolidated debt and customer deposits outstanding as of September 30, 2017 and December 31, 2016: Table 22: Summary of Consolidated Debt and Customer Deposits During the three months ended September 30, 2017, we issued (i) $519 million of asset-backed securities from the American Express Credit Account Master Trust (the Lending Trust) consisting of $500 million of five year Class A Certificates at a floating rate of 1-month LIBOR plus 38 basis points and $19 million of five year Class B Certificates at a floating rate of 1-month LIBOR plus 58 basis points, and (ii) $2.3 billion of senior unsecured notes from American Express Company consisting of $1.9 billion of five year notes at a fixed rate of 2.50% and $400 million of five year notes at a floating rate of 3-month LIBOR plus 61 basis points. Our equity capital and funding strategies are designed, among other things, to maintain appropriate and stable unsecured debt ratings from the major credit rating agencies: Moody s Investor Services (Moody s), Standard Poor s (S P), Fitch Ratings (Fitch) and Dominion Bond Rating Services (DBRS). Such ratings help support our access to cost-effective unsecured funding as part of our overall funding strategy. Our asset securitization activities are rated separately. Table 23: Unsecured Debt Ratings Downgrades in the ratings of our unsecured debt or asset securitization program securities could result in higher funding costs, as well as higher fees related to borrowings under our unused lines of credit. Declines in credit ratings could also reduce our borrowing capacity in the unsecured debt and asset securitization capital markets. We believe our funding mix, including the proportion of U.S. retail deposits insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC), should reduce the impact that credit rating downgrades would have on our funding capacity and costs. 53 Table of Contents Liquidity Management We incur liquidity risk that arises in the course of offering our products and services. Our liquidity objective is to maintain access to a diverse set of on- and off-balance sheet liquidity sources. We seek to maintain liquidity sources, even in the event we are unable to raise new funds under our regular funding programs during a substantial weakening in economic conditions, in amounts sufficient to meet our expected future financial obligations and business requirements for liquidity for a period of at least twelve months. Our liquidity risk policy sets out our objectives and approach to managing liquidity risk. The liquidity risks that we are exposed to could arise from a wide variety of scenarios. Our liquidity management strategy thus includes a number of elements, including, but not limited to: The amount and type of liquidity resources we maintain can vary over time, based upon the results of stress scenarios required under the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act (Dodd-Frank) and other various regulatory liquidity requirements, such as the Liquidity Coverage Ratio (LCR), as well as additional stress scenarios required under our liquidity risk policy. The investment income we receive on liquidity resources, such as cash, is less than the interest expense on the sources of funding for these balances. The net interest costs to maintain these resources have been substantial. The level of future net interest costs depends on the amount of liquidity resources we maintain and the difference between our cost of funding these amounts and their investment yields. Securitized Borrowing Capacity As of September 30, 2017, we maintained our committed, revolving, secured borrowing facility, with a maturity date of July 15, 2020, that gives us the right to sell up to $3.0 billion face amount of eligible AAA notes from the American Express Issuance Trust II (the Charge Trust). We also maintained our committed, revolving, secured borrowing facility that gives us the right to sell up to $2.0 billion face amount of eligible AAA certificates from the Lending Trust. On September 15, 2017, we extended the Lending Trust s $2.0 billion facility by two years to mature on September 15, 2020. Both facilities are used in the ordinary course of business to fund seasonal working capital needs, as well as to further enhance our contingent funding resources. As of September 30, 2017, no amounts were drawn on the Charge Trust or Lending Trust facilities. On October 6, 2017, $3.0 billion was drawn on the Charge Trust facility. Federal Reserve Discount Window As insured depository institutions, Centurion Bank and American Express Bank may borrow from the Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco, subject to the amount of qualifying collateral that they may pledge. The Federal Reserve has indicated that both credit and charge card receivables are a form of qualifying collateral for secured borrowings made through the discount window. Whether specific assets will be considered qualifying collateral and the amount that may be borrowed against the collateral, remain at the discretion of the Federal Reserve. We had approximately $64.3 billion as of September 30, 2017 in U.S. credit card loans and charge card receivables that could be sold over time through our securitization trusts or pledged in return for secured borrowings to provide further liquidity, subject in each case to applicable market conditions and eligibility criteria. Committed Bank Credit Facility In addition to the secured borrowing facilities described earlier in this section, we maintained a committed syndicated bank credit facility as of September 30, 2017 of $3.0 billion. On October 16, 2017, we increased the committed syndicated bank credit facility size to $3.5 billion and extended the facility by two years to mature on October 16, 2020. As of September 30, 2017, no amounts were drawn on this facility. Unused Credit Outstanding As of September 30, 2017, we had approximately $268 billion of unused credit outstanding as part of established lending product agreements. Total unused credit does not represent potential future cash requirements, as a significant portion of this unused credit will likely not be drawn. Our charge card products generally have no pre-set limit, and therefore are not reflected in unused credit available to Card Members. 54 Table of Contents Cash Flows The following table summarizes our cash flow activity for the nine months ended September 30: Table 24: Cash Flows Cash Flows from Operating Activities Our cash flows from operating activities primarily include net income adjusted for (i) non-cash items included in net income and (ii) changes in the balances of operating assets and liabilities, which can vary significantly in the normal course of business due to the amount and timing of payments. Net cash provided by operating activities was driven by net income of $3.9 billion and $4.6 billion for the current and prior periods, respectively, adjusted for non-cash items including changes in provisions for losses, depreciation and amortization, deferred taxes, and stock-based compensation. The prior period net income includes gains of $1.2 billion on the sales of the HFS portfolios, which are presented in Net (increase) decrease in Card Member receivables and loans, including held for sale, within cash flows from investing activities. The increase in cash provided by operating activities during the periods of comparison was also driven by impacts from movements in Other receivables and Accounts payable and other liabilities as a result of normal business operating activities. Cash Flows from Investing Activities Our cash flows from investing activities primarily include changes in Card Member receivables and loans, including Card Member loans and receivables HFS, along with gains on sales related thereto, as well as changes in our available for sale investment securities portfolio. The decrease in net cash provided by investing activities primarily reflected the sale of the HFS portfolios in the prior period, as well as growth in Card Member loans and receivables and a higher increase in restricted cash in the current period. Cash Flows from Financing Activities Our cash flows from financing activities primarily include issuing and repaying debt, changes in customer deposits, issuing and repurchasing our common shares, and paying dividends. The increase in net cash provided by financing activities was primarily driven by an increase in customer deposits during the current period, versus a decrease in the prior period, and net long-term debt issuances during the current period, versus net long-term debt repayments during the prior period. 55 Table of Contents OTHER MATTERS Certain Legislative, Regulatory and Other Developments We are subject to comprehensive government regulation and supervision in jurisdictions around the world, and the costs of compliance are substantial. In recent years, the financial services industry has been subject to rigorous scrutiny, high regulatory expectations, and a stringent and unpredictable regulatory enforcement environment. Please see the Supervision and Regulation and Risk Factors sections of the Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016 (the 2016 Form 10-K) for further information. Payments Regulation Legislators and regulators in various countries in which we operate have focused on the operation of card networks, including through antitrust actions, legislation and regulations to change certain practices or pricing of card issuers, merchant acquirers and payment networks, and, in some cases, to establish broad and ongoing regulatory oversight regimes for payment systems. The European Union, Australia and other jurisdictions have focused on the fees merchants pay to accept cards, including the way bankcard network members collectively set the interchange (that is, the fee paid by the bankcard merchant acquirer to the card issuer in four party networks like Visa and MasterCard), as well as the rules, contract terms and practices governing merchant card acceptance. Even where we are not directly regulated, regulation of bankcard fees can significantly negatively impact the discount revenue derived from our business, including as a result of downward pressure on our discount rate from decreases in competitor pricing in connection with caps on interchange fees. In some cases, such regulation extends to certain aspects of our business. For example, the EU regulation might apply price caps as well as other regulatory measures in circumstances where three-party networks issue cards with a cobrand partner or through an agent. We have brought a legal challenge and seek a ruling from the EU Court of Justice to clarify the interpretation and validity of that part of the regulation. As a precursor to the Court s final ruling, an advisory opinion was issued on July 6, 2017 advising the Court that (a) the case should be declared inadmissible and (b) if the Court determines to treat the case as admissible, the law should be considered valid and applicable. The advisory opinion is not binding on the Court and there can be no assurance as to the outcome of our legal challenge. For more information on the European Union payments legislation, our related legal challenge and the Australia payments regulation, as well as the potential impacts on our results of operations and business, please see the Supervision and Regulation and Risk Factors sections of the 2016 Form 10-K. Broad regulatory oversight over payment systems can also include, in some cases, requirements for international card networks to localize aspects of their operations, such as processing infrastructure, which could increase our costs and diminish the value of our closed loop. The development and enforcement of payment system regulatory regimes generally continue to grow and may adversely affect our ability to compete effectively and maintain and extend our global network. Surcharging In certain countries, such as certain Member States in the European Union and Australia, merchants are permitted by law to surcharge card purchases. While surcharging continues to be actively considered in certain jurisdictions, the benefits to customers have not been apparent in countries that have allowed it, and in some cases regulators are addressing concerns about excessive surcharging by merchants. For example, the Reserve Bank of Australia amended its rules to limit surcharging in Australia to the actual cost of card acceptance paid to the merchant acquirer. Surcharging, particularly where it disproportionately impacts American Express Card Members, which is known as differential surcharging, as well as other steering practices that are permitted by regulation in some countries, could have a material adverse effect on us if it becomes widespread. As revisions to the Payment Services Directive in the European Union are transposed into national law by each Member State, there may be increased instances of differential surcharging of our cards, customer and merchant confusion as to which transactions may be surcharged and Card Member dissatisfaction. On July 19, 2017, the U.K. indicated it would ban surcharging on consumer cards starting January 2018. In addition, the laws of a number of states in the United States that prohibit surcharging are being challenged in litigation brought by merchant groups. 56 Table of Contents For more information on the potential impacts of surcharging and other actions that could impair the Card Member experience, please see the Risk Factors section of the 2016 Form 10-K. Consumer Financial Products Regulation In the United States, our marketing, sale and servicing of consumer financial products and our compliance with certain federal consumer financial laws are supervised and examined by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau (CFPB), which has broad rulemaking and enforcement authority over providers of credit, savings and payment services and products and authority to prevent unfair, deceptive or abusive acts or practices. In addition, a number of U.S. states have significant consumer credit protection, disclosure and other laws (in certain cases more stringent than U.S. federal laws). U.S. federal law also regulates abusive debt collection practices, which along with bankruptcy and debtor relief laws, can affect our ability to collect amounts owed to us or subject us to regulatory scrutiny. Internal and regulatory reviews to assess compliance with such laws and regulations have resulted in, and are likely to continue to result in, changes to our practices, products and procedures, substantial restitution to our Card Members and increased costs related to regulatory oversight, supervision and examination. Such reviews may also result in additional regulatory actions, including civil money penalties. These types of reviews will be a continuing focus for the CFPB and regulators more broadly, as well as for the company itself. As an example, federal banking regulators announced they are conducting horizontal reviews of banking sales practices and we are cooperating with regulators in those reviews. Also, in August 2017 we announced that certain of our subsidiaries signed a consent order with the CFPB to resolve issues related to a previously-disclosed internal review of our card product offerings in Puerto Rico, the U.S. Virgin Islands and other U.S. Territories. On July 10, 2017, the CFPB issued a final rule that, among other changes, would prohibit providers of certain consumer financial products and services from using a pre-dispute arbitration agreement to bar consumers from filing or participating in a class action. The rule would apply to agreements entered into on or after March 19, 2018. As a result of the rule, we may face increased class claims and therefore be subject to the complexities and costs associated with class action litigation. Given the inherent uncertainties involved in litigation, and the very large or indeterminate damages sought in some class action matters, there is significant uncertainty as to the ultimate impact of this rule. For more information on consumer financial products regulation, as well as the potential impacts on our results of operations and business, please see the Supervision and Regulation and Risk Factors sections of the 2016 Form 10-K. Antitrust Litigation The U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ) and certain states attorneys general brought an action against us in 2010 alleging that the provisions in our card acceptance agreements with merchants that prohibit merchants from engaging in various actions to discriminate against our card products violate the U.S. antitrust laws. We continue to vigorously defend this and similar antitrust claims initiated by merchants in other court and arbitration proceedings. See Part II, Item 1. Legal Proceedings below and the Legal Proceedings section in our 2016 Form 10-K for descriptions of the DOJ and related cases. It is possible that significantly increased merchant steering or other actions impairing the Card Member experience, or the resolution of one or any combination of these merchant claims for damages, could have a material adverse effect on our business. For more information on the potential impacts of an adverse decision in the merchant litigations on our business, please see the Risk Factors section of the 2016 Form 10-K. 57 Table of Contents Recently Issued Accounting Standards Refer to the Recently Issued Accounting Standards section of Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial Statements. Glossary of Selected Terminology Adjusted net interest income A non-GAAP measure that represents net interest income attributable to our Card Member loans and loans HFS (which includes, on a GAAP basis, interest that is deemed uncollectible), excluding the impact of interest expense and interest income not attributable to our Card Member loans. We believe adjusted net interest income is useful to investors because it is a component of net interest yield on Card Member loans. Asset securitizations Asset securitization involves the transfer and sale of loans or receivables to a special-purpose entity created for the securitization activity, typically a trust. The trust, in turn, issues securities, commonly referred to as asset-backed securities that are secured by the transferred loans and receivables. The trust uses the proceeds from the sale of such securities to pay the purchase price for the underlying loans or receivables. The loans and receivables of our Lending Trust and Charge Trust (collectively, the Trusts) securitized are reported as assets and the securities issued by the Trusts are reported as liabilities on our Consolidated Balance Sheets. Average discount rate This calculation is generally designed to reflect pricing at merchants accepting general-purpose American Express cards. It represents the percentage of billed business (generated from both proprietary and GNS Card Member spending) retained by us from merchants we acquire, or for merchants acquired by a third party on our behalf, net of amounts retained by such third party. Basic cards-in-force Proprietary basic consumer cards-in-force includes basic cards issued to the primary account owner, (i.e., not including additional supplemental cards issued on accounts). Proprietary basic small business and corporate cards-in-force includes both basic and supplemental cards issued. Non-proprietary basic cards-in-force includes cards that are issued and outstanding under network partnership agreements, except for supplemental cards and retail cobrand Card Member accounts which have had no out-of-store spending activity during the prior twelve-month period. Billed business Includes activities (including cash advances) related to proprietary cards, cards issued under network partnership agreements (non-proprietary billed business), corporate payment services and certain insurance fees charged on proprietary cards. In-store spending activity within retail cobrand portfolios in GNS, from which we earn no revenue, is not included in non-proprietary billed business. Card billed business is included in the United States or outside the United States based on where the issuer is located. Capital ratios Represents the minimum standards established by the regulatory agencies as a measure to determine whether the regulated entity has sufficient capital to absorb on- and off-balance sheet losses beyond current loss accrual estimates. Refer to the Capital Strategy section under Consolidated Capital Resources and Liquidity for further related definitions under Transitional Basel III and Fully Phased-in Basel III. Card Member The individual holder of an issued American Express-branded charge, credit and certain prepaid cards. Card Member loans Represents the outstanding amount due from Card Members for charges made on their American Express credit cards, as well as any interest charges and card-related fees. Card Member loans also include revolving balances on certain American Express charge card products. Card Member loans and receivables HFS Beginning as of December 1, 2015 and continuing until the sales were completed, represents Card Member loans and receivables related to our cobrand partnerships with Costco in the United States and JetBlue. The JetBlue and Costco portfolio sales were completed on March 18 and June 17, 2016, respectively. Card Member receivables Represents the outstanding amount due from Card Members for charges made on their American Express charge cards, as well as any card-related fees. Charge cards Represents cards that generally carry no pre-set spending limits and are primarily designed as a method of payment and not as a means of financing purchases. Charge Card Members generally must pay the full amount billed each month. No finance charges are assessed on charge cards. Each charge card transaction is authorized based on its likely economics reflecting a Card Member s most recent credit information and spend patterns. Some charge card accounts have additional Pay Over Time feature(s) that allow revolving of certain balances. 58 Table of Contents Cobrand cards Cards issued under cobrand agreements with selected commercial firms. Pursuant to the cobrand agreements, we make payments to our cobrand partners, which can be significant, based primarily on the amount of Card Member spending and corresponding rewards earned on such spending and, under certain arrangements, on the number of accounts acquired and retained. In some cases, the partner is liable for providing rewards to the Card Member under the cobrand partner s own loyalty program. Credit cards Represents cards that have a range of revolving payment terms, grace periods, and rate and fee structures. Discount revenue Represents revenue earned from fees generally charged to merchants who have entered into a card acceptance agreement. The discount fee generally is deducted from our payment for Card Member purchases. Discount revenue is reduced by incentive payments made to merchants, payments to third-party card issuing partners, cash-back reward costs and statement credits, corporate incentive payments and other similar items. Interest expense Includes interest incurred primarily to fund Card Member loans and receivables, general corporate purposes and liquidity needs, and is recognized as incurred. Interest expense is divided principally into two categories: (i) deposits, which primarily relates to interest expense on deposits taken from customers and institutions, and (ii) debt, which primarily relates to interest expense on our long-term financing and short-term borrowings, (e.g., commercial paper, federal funds purchased, bank overdrafts and other short-term borrowings), as well as the realized impact of derivatives hedging interest rate risk on our long-term debt. Interest income Includes (i) interest on loans, (ii) interest and dividends on investment securities and (iii) interest income on deposits with banks and other. Interest on loans Assessed using the average daily balance method for Card Member loans and loans HFS. Unless the loan is classified as non-accrual, interest is recognized based upon the principal amount outstanding in accordance with the terms of the applicable account agreement until the outstanding balance is paid or written off. Interest and dividends on investment securities Primarily relates to our performing fixed-income securities. Interest income is recognized as earned using the effective interest method, which adjusts the yield for security premiums and discounts, fees and other payments, so a constant rate of return is recognized on the outstanding balance of the related investment security throughout its term. Amounts are recognized until securities are in default or when it is likely that future interest payments will not be made as scheduled. Interest income on deposits with banks and other Recognized as earned, and primarily relates to the placement of cash in excess of near-term funding requirements in interest-bearing time deposits, overnight sweep accounts, and other interest-bearing demand and call accounts. Liquidity Coverage Ratio Represents the minimum standards established by the regulatory agencies as a measure to determine whether the regulated entity has sufficient liquidity to meet liquidity needs in periods of financial and economic stress. Merchant acquisition Represents our process of entering into agreements with merchants to accept American Express-branded cards. Net card fees Represents the card membership fees earned during the period. These fees are recognized as revenue over the covered card membership period (typically one year), net of the provision for projected refunds for Card Membership cancellation and deferred acquisition costs. Net interest yield on Card Member loans A non-GAAP measure that is computed by dividing adjusted net interest income by average loans, computed on an annualized basis. Reserves and net write-offs related to uncollectible interest are recorded through provisions for losses, and are thus not included in the net interest yield calculation. We believe net interest yield on Card Member loans is useful to investors because it provides a measure of profitability of our Card Member loan portfolio. Net loss ratio Represents the ratio of GCP charge card write-offs, consisting of principal (resulting from authorized transactions) and fee components, less recoveries, on Card Member receivables expressed as a percentage of gross amounts billed to corporate Card Members. Net write-off rate principal only Represents the amount of proprietary consumer or small business Card Member loans or receivables written off, consisting of principal (resulting from authorized transactions), less recoveries, as a percentage of the average loan or receivables balance during the period. Net write-off rate principal, interest and fees Includes, in the calculation of the net write-off rate, amounts for interest and fees in addition to principal for Card Member loans and fees in addition to principal for Card Member receivables. 59 Table of Contents Operating expenses Represents salaries and employee benefits, professional services, occupancy and equipment, and other expenses. Return on average equity Calculated by dividing one-year period net income by one-year average total shareholders equity. Return on average segment capital Calculated by dividing one-year period segment income by one-year average segment capital. Segment capital Represents the capital allocated to a segment based upon specific business operational needs, risk measures, and regulatory capital requirements. Total cards-in-force Represents the total number of charge and credit cards that are issued and outstanding and accepted on our network. Non-proprietary cards-in-force includes all charge and credit cards that are issued and outstanding under network partnership agreements, except for retail cobrand Card Member accounts which have no out-of-store spending activity during the prior twelve-month period. 60 Table of Contents °Item 3. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK Market risk is the risk to earnings or asset and liability values resulting from movements in market prices. Our market risk exposures include (i) interest rate risk due to changes in the relationship between the interest rates on our assets (such as loans, receivables and investment securities) and the interest rates on our liabilities (such as debt and deposits); and (ii) foreign exchange risk related to transactions, funding, investments and earnings in currencies other than the U.S. dollar. There were no material changes in these market risks since December 31, 2016. °Item 4. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES Our management, with the participation of our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, has evaluated the effectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act)) as of the end of the period covered by this report. Based on such evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer have concluded that, as of the end of such period, our disclosure controls and procedures are effective and designed to ensure that the information required to be disclosed in our reports filed or submitted under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the requisite time periods specified in the applicable rules and forms, and that it is accumulated and communicated to our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure. There have not been any changes in our internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act) during the fiscal quarter to which this report relates that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting. Cautionary Note Regarding Forward-looking Statements This report includes forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which are subject to risks and uncertainties. The forward-looking statements, which address our expected business and financial performance, among other matters, contain words such as believe, expect, estimate, anticipate, intend, plan, aim, will, may, should, could, would, likely, and similar expressions. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements, which speak only as of the date on which they are made. We undertake no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements. Factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements, include, but are not limited to, the following: 61 Table of Contents 62 Table of Contents A further description of these uncertainties and other risks can be found in the 2016 Form 10-K and our other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. 63 Table of Contents PART II. OTHER INFORMATION °Item 1. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS In the ordinary course of business, we are subject to various pending and potential legal actions, arbitration proceedings, claims, investigations, examinations, information gathering requests, subpoenas, inquiries and matters relating to compliance with laws and regulations (collectively, legal proceedings). We do not believe we are a party to, nor are any of our properties the subject of, any legal proceeding that would have a material adverse effect on our consolidated financial condition or liquidity. However, in light of the uncertainties involved in such matters, including the fact that some pending legal proceedings are at preliminary stages or seek an indeterminate amount of damages, it is possible that the outcome of legal proceedings, including the possible resolution of merchant claims, could have a material impact on our results of operations. In addition, it is possible that significantly increased merchant steering or other actions impairing the Card Member experience could have a material adverse effect on our business. Certain legal proceedings involving us or our subsidiaries are described in this section and others, for which there have been no subsequent material developments since the filing of our 2016 Form 10-K, are described in such report. For additional information, see Note 8 to our Consolidated Financial Statements. In 2010, the DOJ, along with Attorneys General from Arizona, Connecticut, Hawaii (Hawaii has since withdrawn its claim), Idaho, Illinois, Iowa, Maryland, Michigan, Missouri, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, Ohio, Rhode Island, Tennessee, Texas, Utah and Vermont filed a complaint in the U.S. District Court for the Eastern District of New York against us, MasterCard International Incorporated and Visa, Inc., alleging a violation of Section 1 of the Sherman Antitrust Act (the DOJ case). The complaint included allegations that provisions in our merchant agreements prohibiting merchants from steering a customer to use another network s card or another type of general-purpose card ( anti-steering and non-discrimination contractual provisions) violate the antitrust laws. The complaint sought a judgment permanently enjoining us from enforcing our non-discrimination contractual provisions. The complaint did not seek monetary damages. Following a non-jury trial in the DOJ case, the trial court found that the challenged provisions were anticompetitive and on April 30, 2015, the court issued a final judgment entering a permanent injunction. Following our appeal of this judgment, on September 26, 2016, the Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit reversed the trial court decision and directed the trial court to enter a judgment for American Express. Following denial of rehearing en banc by the Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit, the trial court entered judgment for American Express on January 25, 2017. On June 2, 2017, the DOJ announced it would not petition the U.S. Supreme Court to review the Second Circuit s decision in favor of American Express. At the same time, 11 of the 17 states that are party to the case filed a petition with the Supreme Court seeking such a review. On October 16, 2017, the U.S. Supreme Court granted certiorari. On July 30, 2015, plaintiff Plumbers and Steamfitters Local 137 Pension Fund, on behalf of themselves and other purchasers of American Express stock, filed a suit, captioned Plumbers and Steamfitters Local 137 Pension Fund v. American Express Co., Kenneth I. Chenault and Jeffrey C. Campbell, in the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York for violation of federal securities law, alleging that the Company deliberately issued false and misleading statements to, and omitted important information from, the public relating to the financial importance of the Costco cobrand relationship to the Company, including, but not limited to, the decision to accelerate negotiations to renew the cobrand agreement. The plaintiff sought damages and injunctive relief. On October 2, 2017, the Court granted defendants motion to dismiss the plaintiff s amended complaint with leave to replead. On October 16, 2015, a putative class action, captioned Houssain v. American Express Company, et al. , was filed in the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (ERISA) relating to disclosures of the Costco cobrand relationship. On May 10, 2016, the plaintiff filed an amended complaint naming certain officers of the Company as defendants and alleging that the defendants violated certain ERISA fiduciary obligations by, among other things, allowing the investment of American Express Retirement Savings Plan (Plan) assets in American Express common stock when American Express common stock was not a prudent investment and misrepresenting and failing to disclose material facts to Plan participants in connection with the administration of the Plan. The amended complaint sought, among other remedies, an unspecified amount of damages. On September 28, 2017, the Court granted defendants motion to dismiss the amended complaint. 64 Table of Contents °Item 1A. RISK FACTORS For a discussion of our risk factors, see Part I, Item 1A. Risk Factors of the 2016 Form 10-K. There are no material changes from the risk factors set forth in the 2016 Form 10-K. However, the risks and uncertainties that we face are not limited to those set forth in the 2016 Form 10-K. Additional risks and uncertainties not presently known to us or that we currently believe to be immaterial may also adversely affect our business and the trading price of our securities. 65 Table of Contents °Item 2. UNREGISTERED SALES OF EQUITY SECURITIES AND USE OF PROCEEDS (c) ISSUER PURCHASES OF SECURITIES The table below sets forth the information with respect to purchases of our common stock made by or on behalf of us during the three months ended September 30, 2017. 66 Table of Contents . °Item 5. OTHER INFORMATION CEO Succession On October 18, 2017, we announced that the Board of Directors appointed Stephen J. Squeri, 58, Chief Executive Officer of American Express Company and elected him Chairman of the Board, each effective February 1, 2018. Mr. Squeri succeeds Kenneth I. Chenault, 66, who will retire as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer on that date. Mr. Squeri has been Vice Chairman since 2015 and prior to that was Group President, Global Corporate Services. In connection with his new role, effective February 1, 2018 Mr. Squeri will receive an annual base salary of $1.5 million and will be eligible to earn an annual cash incentive award of $4.5 million and an annual long-term incentive award consisting of restricted stock units and stock options with a value of $10.2 million. In addition, Mr. Squeri will be awarded performance-vesting options on October 31, 2017 with a grant date fair value of $4.5 million. On the same date, Douglas E. Buckminster, President, Global Consumer Services, and Anr Williams, President, Global Merchant Services and Loyalty, will also be granted performance-vesting stock options, each with a grant date fair value of $2.25 million, in connection with the CEO transition. The options will have a term of seven years, an exercise price equal to the closing price on the grant date and vesting subject to (i) a stock price goal of 30% above the closing price on the grant date, which must be met for a period of 20 consecutive trading days during the five-year period beginning on the grant date, (ii) a financial goal of positive cumulative GAAP net income for the three-year period 2018-2020 and (iii) a three-year service condition. 50% of the net after-tax shares received upon exercise must be held for at least 12 months. Required Iran Disclosures Pursuant to Section 219 of the Iran Threat Reduction and Syria Human Rights Act of 2012, which added Section 13(r) to the Exchange Act, an issuer is required to disclose in its annual or quarterly reports, as applicable, whether it or any of its affiliates knowingly engaged in certain activities, transactions or dealings relating to Iran or with individuals or entities designated pursuant to certain Executive Orders. Disclosure is generally required even where the activities, transactions or dealings were conducted outside the United States by non-U.S. affiliates in compliance with applicable law, and whether or not the activities are sanctionable under U.S. law. American Express Global Business Travel (GBT) and certain entities that may be considered affiliates of GBT have informed us that during the third quarter of 2017 approximately 73 visas were obtained from Iranian embassies and consulates around the world in connection with certain travel arrangements on behalf of clients. GBT had negligible gross revenues and net profits attributable to these transactions and intends to continue to engage in these activities on a limited basis so long as such activities are permitted under U.S. law. °Item 6. EXHIBITS The list of exhibits required to be filed as exhibits to this report are listed on page E-1 hereof, under Exhibit Index which is incorporated herein by reference. 67 Table of Contents SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. 68 Table of Contents EXHIBIT INDEX The following exhibits are filed as part of this Quarterly Report: E-1 